Missouri, session 2026, SB1702.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 478.385, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 478.385,
to read as follows:
478.385. There shall be four circuit judges in the
seventh judicial circuit [consisting of the county of
Clay]. Beginning fiscal year 2028, there shall be five
circuit judges in the seventh judicial circuit.
✓
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.